Indiana, session 2026, HB1320.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 34-26-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.161-2018,
SECTION 107, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The office of judicial
administration shall:
(1) develop and adopt:
(A) a petition for an order for protection;
(B) an order for protection, including:
(i) orders issued under this chapter;
(ii) ex parte orders;
(iii) no contact orders under IC 31 and IC 35;
(iv) forms relating to workplace violence restraining orders
under IC 34-26-6; and
(v) forms relating to a child protective order under
IC 31-34-2.3;
(C) a confidential form;
(D) a notice of modification or extension for an order for
protection, a no contact order, a workplace violence restraining
2026 IN 1320—LS 6296/DI 151


order, or a child protective order;
(E) a notice of termination for an order for protection, a no
contact order, a workplace violence restraining order, or a
child protective order; and
(F) any other uniform statewide forms necessary to maintain
an accurate registry of orders; and
(2) provide the forms under subdivision (1):
(A) to the clerk of each court authorized to issue the orders;
and
(B) necessary to file for an order for protection to every
law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction in the county.
(b) In addition to any other required information, a petition for an
order for protection must contain a statement listing each civil or
criminal action involving:
(1) either party; or
(2) a child of either party.
(c) The following statements must be printed in boldface type or in
capital letters on an order for protection, a no contact order, a
workplace violence restraining order, or a child protective order:
VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER IS PUNISHABLE BY
CONFINEMENT IN JAIL, PRISON, AND/OR A FINE.
IF SO ORDERED BY THE COURT, THE RESPONDENT IS
FORBIDDEN TO ENTER OR STAY AT THE PETITIONER'S
RESIDENCE OR RESIDENCE OF ANY CHILD WHO IS THE
SUBJECT OF THE ORDER, EVEN IF INVITED TO DO SO BY
THE PETITIONER OR ANY OTHER PERSON. IN NO EVENT
IS THE ORDER FOR PROTECTION VOIDED.
PURSUANT TO 18 U.S.C. 2265, THIS ORDER FOR
PROTECTION SHALL BE GIVEN FULL FAITH AND CREDIT
IN ANY OTHER STATE OR TRIBAL LAND AND SHALL BE
ENFORCED AS IF IT WERE AN ORDER ISSUED IN THAT
STATE OR TRIBAL LAND. PURSUANT TO 18 U.S.C. 922(g),
ONCE A RESPONDENT HAS RECEIVED NOTICE OF THIS
ORDER AND AN OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD, IT IS A
FEDERAL VIOLATION TO PURCHASE, RECEIVE, OR
POSSESS A FIREARM WHILE SUBJECT TO THIS ORDER IF
THE PROTECTED PERSON IS:
(A) THE RESPONDENT'S CURRENT OR FORMER
SPOUSE;
(B) A CURRENT OR FORMER PERSON WITH WHOM
THE RESPONDENT RESIDED WHILE IN AN INTIMATE
RELATIONSHIP; OR
2026 IN 1320—LS 6296/DI 151


(C) A PERSON WITH WHOM THE RESPONDENT HAS A
CHILD.
INTERSTATE VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER MAY SUBJECT
THE RESPONDENT TO FEDERAL CRIMINAL PENALTIES
UNDER 18 U.S.C. 2261 AND 18 U.S.C. 2262.
(d) The clerk of the circuit court, or a person or entity designated by
the clerk of the circuit court, or a law enforcement officer shall
provide to a person requesting an order for protection:
(1) the forms adopted under subsection (a);
(2) all other forms required to petition for an order for protection,
including forms:
(A) necessary for service; and
(B) required under IC 31-21 (or IC 31-17-3 before its repeal);
and
(3) clerical assistance in reading or completing the forms and
filing the petition. A law enforcement officer who provides the
forms to a victim of domestic battery or harassment shall,
unless the victim refuses assistance:
(A) remain with the victim while the victim completes the
forms; and
(B) as soon as practicable, file the forms with the
appropriate court.
Clerical assistance provided by the clerk, or court personnel, or a law
enforcement officer under this section does not constitute the practice
of law. The clerk of the circuit court may enter into a contract with a
person or another entity to provide this assistance. A person, other than
a person or other entity with whom the clerk has entered into a contract
to provide assistance, who in good faith performs the duties the person
is required to perform under this subsection is not liable for civil
damages that might otherwise be imposed on the person as a result of
the performance of those duties unless the person commits an act or
omission that amounts to gross negligence or willful and wanton
misconduct.
(e) A petition for an order for protection must be:
(1) verified or under oath under Trial Rule 11; and
(2) issued on the forms adopted under subsection (a).
(f) If an order for protection is issued under this chapter, the clerk
shall comply with IC 5-2-9.
(g) After receiving a petition for an order for protection, the clerk of
the circuit court shall immediately enter the case in the Indiana
protective order registry established by IC 5-2-9-5.5.
SECTION 2. IC 35-33-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
2026 IN 1320—LS 6296/DI 151


SECTION 228, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A law enforcement officer
may arrest a person when the officer has:
(1) a warrant commanding that the person be arrested;
(2) probable cause to believe the person has committed or
attempted to commit, or is committing or attempting to commit,
a felony;
(3) probable cause to believe the person has violated the
provisions of IC 9-26-1-1.1 or IC 9-30-5;
(4) probable cause to believe the person is committing or
attempting to commit a misdemeanor in the officer's presence;
(5) probable cause to believe the person has committed a:
(A) battery resulting in bodily injury under IC 35-42-2-1; or
(B) domestic battery under IC 35-42-2-1.3;
The officer may use an affidavit executed by an individual alleged
to have direct knowledge of the incident alleging the elements of
the offense of battery to establish probable cause;
(6) probable cause to believe that the person violated
IC 35-46-1-15.1 (invasion of privacy) or IC 35-46-1-15.3;
(7) probable cause to believe that the person violated
IC 35-47-2-1.5 (unlawful carrying of a handgun) or IC 35-47-2-22
(counterfeit handgun license);
(8) probable cause to believe that the person is violating or has
violated an order issued under IC 35-50-7;
(9) probable cause to believe that the person is violating or has
violated IC 35-47-6-1.1 (undisclosed transport of a dangerous
device);
(10) probable cause to believe that the person is:
(A) violating or has violated IC 35-45-2-5 (interference with
the reporting of a crime); and
(B) interfering with or preventing the reporting of a crime
involving domestic or family violence (as defined in
IC 34-6-2.1-50);
(11) probable cause to believe that the person has committed theft
(IC 35-43-4-2);
(12) a removal order issued for the person by an immigration
court;
(13) a detainer or notice of action for the person issued by the
United States Department of Homeland Security; or
(14) probable cause to believe that the person has been indicted
for or convicted of one (1) or more aggravated felonies (as
defined in 8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(43)).
2026 IN 1320—LS 6296/DI 151


(b) A person who:
(1) is employed full time as a federal enforcement officer;
(2) is empowered to effect an arrest with or without warrant for a
violation of the United States Code; and
(3) is authorized to carry firearms in the performance of the
person's duties;
may act as an officer for the arrest of offenders against the laws of this
state where the person reasonably believes that a felony has been or is
about to be committed or attempted in the person's presence.
(c) A law enforcement officer who arrests a child or takes a child
into custody as described in IC 31-37-4-3.5 shall make a reasonable
attempt to notify:
(1) the child's parent, guardian, or custodian; or
(2) the emergency contact listed on the child's school record;
that the child has been arrested or taken into custody.
2026 IN 1320—LS 6296/DI 151